Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 22.1-176.
Transportation of pupils authorized; when fee may be charged; contributions; regulations of Board of Education.

School boards may provide for the transportation of pupils, but nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring such transportation except as provided in § 22.1-221.

When a school board provides transportation to pupils for extracurricular activities, other than those covered by an activity fund, which are sponsored by the pupils’ school apart from the regular instructional program and which the pupils are not required to attend or participate in, the school board may accept contributions for such transportation or charge each pupil utilizing such transportation a reasonable fee not to exceed his pro rata share of the cost of providing such transportation. A school board may waive such fees for any pupil whose parent or guardian is financially unable to pay them.

When a school board provides transportation to pupils for field trips which are a part of the program of the pupils’ school or are sponsored by such school, the school board may accept contributions for such transportation.

The Board of Education shall promulgate such regulations as shall be in the public interest to effect the intent of this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-72.1, 22-97.1; 1954, c. 291; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 60; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1970, c. 156; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 86; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1976, c. 99; 1978, cc. 430, 527; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

For section requiring the routing of school buses so as to avoid the necessity of pupils’ crossing divided highways, see §

46.2-918

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local school boards may not charge for the transportation of students to and from school.

See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John S. Reid, Member, House of Delegates, 07-053, 2007 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (8/29/07).

Transportation to special program. —

A local school board may not charge a fee for the transportation of a student enrolled in a specialty program located outside the boundaries of the student’s base school. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jackson H. Miller, Member, House of Delegates, 10-016, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (3/18/10).

§ 22.1-176.1.
Agreements to provide transportation for nonpublic school pupils.

Local school boards may enter into agreements with nonpublic schools within the school division to provide student transportation to and from such schools and school field trips under such terms and conditions as the local school boards deem appropriate and responsible. Such terms may include arrangements relating to cost-sharing, fees, insurance, and liability.

History.

2007, c. 476; 2016, cc. 57, 145.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 57 and 145 are identical, and inserted “and school field trips” in the first sentence and deleted “but are not limited to” following “may include” in the second sentence.

§ 22.1-176.2.
Certain students; waiver to access student transportation in certain cases.

Each school board that provides for the transportation of students pursuant to § 22.1-176 and that has established a rule, regulation, or policy to exclude certain students who reside within a certain distance from the school at which they are enrolled from accessing such transportation shall establish a process for waiving, on a case-by-case and space-available basis, such exclusion and providing transportation to any such student whose parent is unable to provide adequate transportation for his child to attend school because the parent is providing necessary medical care to another family member who resides in the same household, as evidenced by a written explanation submitted by a licensed health care provider who provides care to such family member.

History.

2020, c. 576.

§ 22.1-177.
Regulations.

The Board may make regulations relating to the construction, design, operation, equipment, and color of public school buses and shall have the authority to issue an order prohibiting the operation on public streets and highways of any public school bus that does not comply with such regulations. Any such order shall be enforced by the Department of State Police.

Local school boards may, notwithstanding any regulation to the contrary, display decals depicting the flag of the United States on the sides and rear of school buses as long as any such decal does not obstruct the name of the school division or the number of the school bus and is no larger than 100 square inches. In addition, local school boards may, notwithstanding any regulation to the contrary, display decals relating to school bus safety. Local school divisions shall be responsible for the cost of the decals. Such decal shall not obstruct the name of the school division or the number of the school bus.

No regulation of the Board shall unreasonably limit the authority of any local school division to purchase and use school buses using compressed natural gas or other alternative fuels or convert its school buses to use compressed natural gas or other alternative fuels.

Any local school board may, notwithstanding any regulation to the contrary, sell or transfer any of its school buses to another school division or purchase a used school bus from another school division or a school bus dealer as long as the school bus (i) conforms to the specifications relating to construction and design effective in the Commonwealth on the date of manufacture; (ii) has a valid Virginia State Police inspection; and (iii) has not reached the end of its useful life according to the school bus replacement schedule utilized by the Department of Education as required by the general appropriation act.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-276; 1958, c. 274; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 191; 2003, c. 162; 2007, c. 104; 2013, c. 778; 2015, c. 559.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 162 added the second paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 104 added the second through last sentences in the second paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 778, in the second paragraph, substituted “relating to school bus safety” for “relating to local school division bus safety hotlines” at the end of the second sentence, and deleted “bearing the number of such safety hotline” at the end of the third sentence; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 559 inserted the subsection designations and added subsection D.

§ 22.1-178.
Requirements for persons employed to drive school buses.

No school board shall hire, employ, or enter into any agreement with any person for the purposes of operating a school bus transporting pupils unless the person proposed to so operate such school bus shall:

Have a physical examination of a scope prescribed by the Board with the advice of the Medical Society of Virginia and furnish a form prescribed by the Board showing the results of such examination.

Furnish a statement or copy of records from the Department of Motor Vehicles showing that the records of such Department do not disclose that the person, within the preceding five years, has been convicted upon a charge of driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, convicted of a felony or assigned to any alcohol safety action program or driver alcohol rehabilitation program pursuant to §

18.2-271.1

or, within the preceding 12 months, has been convicted of two or more moving traffic violations or required to attend a driver improvement clinic by the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

46.2-498

.

Furnish a statement signed by two reputable persons who reside in the school division or in the applicant’s community that the person is of good moral character.

Exhibit a license showing the person has successfully undertaken the examination prescribed by §

46.2-339

.

Have reached the age of 18 by the first day of the school year.

Any school board may require proof of current certification or training in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of an automated external defibrillator as a condition to employment to operate a school bus transporting pupils.

School boards may require persons accepting employment as a driver of a school bus transporting pupils to agree, as a condition of employment, to submit to alcohol and controlled substance testing. Any such tests shall be conducted in compliance with Board regulations.

The documents required pursuant to subdivisions A 1 and 2 shall be furnished annually prior to the anniversary date of the employment agreement as a condition to continuing employment to operate a school bus.

The documents required pursuant to this section shall be filed with, and made a part of, the records of the school board employing such person as a school bus operator.

The Department shall furnish to the several division superintendents the necessary forms to be used by applicants in furnishing the information required by this section. Insofar as practicable, such forms shall be designed to limit paperwork, avoid the possibility of mistake, and furnish all parties involved with a complete and accurate record of the information required.

The physical examination required by subsection A may be performed and the report of the results signed by a licensed nurse practitioner or physician assistant.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-276.1; 1962, c. 544; 1966, c. 604; 1970, c. 696; 1972, c. 359; 1973, c. 170; 1976, cc. 116, 123; 1977, c. 393; 1978, c. 322; 1979, c. 126; 1980, c. 559; 1992, c. 130; 1993, c. 285; 1994, c. 104; 1998, c. 287; 2001, c. 445; 2006, c. 396; 2013, cc. 498, 530; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 498 and 530, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall adopt regulations and establish guidelines to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2022, c. 355, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act that amend
§ 22.1-178 of the Code of Virginia shall not be construed to require any individual who accepted employment on or before July 1, 1994, as a driver of a school bus transporting pupils to agree, as a condition of employment, to submit to alcohol and controlled substance testing.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 445, in subdivision A 3, substituted “persons who reside in” for “residents of,” and inserted “or in the applicant’s community.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 added “or physician assistant” to the end of subsection G.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 498 and 530 are identical, and substituted “proof of current certification or training in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of an automated external defibrillator” for “successful completion of the American National Red Cross first-aid course or its equivalent” in subsection B, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subdivision A 1 and subsection C, deleted “of Education” following “Board” throughout; substituted “by” for “on” in subdivision A 5; deleted “after July 1, 1994” following “persons accepting employment” in subsection C; substituted “Department” for “State Department of Education” in subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

§ 22.1-179.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 130, effective March 3, 1992.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-179, relating to completion of contract upon reaching age seventy, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-276.1; 1962, c. 544; 1966, c. 604; 1970, c. 696; 1972, c. 359; 1973, c. 170; 1976, cc. 116, 123; 1977, c. 393; 1978, c. 322; 1979, c. 126; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-180.
Requirements for persons employed to transport pupils attending religious or private schools.

No person, partnership, association or corporation operating any religious or private school shall hire, employ or enter into any agreement with any person for the purpose of transporting pupils by motor vehicle unless such person shall present the documents and meet the qualifications required of operators of public school buses by subsection A of § 22.1-178. The State Department of Education shall furnish the forms prescribed for the purposes of § 22.1-178 to any person, partnership, association or corporation who shall request such forms for the purpose of compliance with this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-276.2; 1968, c. 432; 1980, c. 559; 2005, c. 928.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928 substituted “religious” for “parochial” in the first sentence.

§ 22.1-181.
Training program for school bus operators.

The Board shall promulgate regulations requiring persons applying for employment, and employed, to operate school buses to complete a training program developed by the Board.

For applicants not currently possessing a commercial driver’s license, such regulations shall require (i) a minimum of 24 hours of classroom training administered pursuant to this section and (ii) six hours of behind-the-wheel training on a school bus that contains no pupil passengers. For applicants currently possessing a commercial driver’s license, such regulations shall require (a) a minimum of four hours of classroom training administered pursuant to this section and (b) three hours of behind-the-wheel training on a school bus that contains no pupil passengers. Behind-the-wheel training shall be administered under the direct on-board supervision of a designated school bus driver trainer.

The training program developed by the Board shall include safety protocols for responding to adverse weather conditions, unsafe conditions during loading and unloading of students, students on the wrong bus, and other circumstances, as determined by the Board, where student safety is at risk.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-276.3; 1977, c. 393; 1980, c. 559; 2018, cc. 203, 389; 2019, c. 769.

Cross references.

As to regulation of driver training schools, see §

46.2-1700

, et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 203 and 389, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles’ initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the State Board of Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 203 and 389 are identical, and added the last three sentences.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 769 designated the existing provisions as subsections A and B; rewrote subsection A, which read: “The Board of Education shall develop a training program for persons applying for employment, and employed, to operate school buses and shall promote its implementation”; and added subsection C.

§ 22.1-182.
Use of school buses for public and commercial purposes.

The school board of any school division may enter into agreements with any third-party logistics company, the governing body of any county, city, or town in the school division, any state agency, or any agency established or identified pursuant to P.L. 89-73 or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto providing for the use of the school buses of such school division by such third-party logistics company or agency or by departments, boards, commissions, or officers of such county, city, or town for public purposes, including transportation for the elderly, or private purposes, except that such third-party logistics company shall not use the school buses to provide transportation of passengers for compensation or for residential delivery of products for compensation. Each such agreement shall provide for reimbursing the school board in full for the proportionate share of any and all costs, both fixed and variable, of such buses incurred by such school board attributable to the use of such buses pursuant to such agreement. Each such agreement shall also require the third-party logistics company, governing body, state agency, or agency established or identified pursuant to P.L. 89-73 or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto to supply insurance on the school bus that meets the minimum coverage requirements in § 22.1-190. The third-party logistics company, governing body, state agency, or agency established or identified pursuant to P.L. 89-73 or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto shall indemnify and hold harmless the school board from any and all liability of the school board by virtue of use of such buses pursuant to an agreement authorized herein.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-151.2; 1973, c. 368; 1975, c. 633; 1980, c. 559; 2022, c. 241.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 241 in the first and last sentences, substituted “P.L. 89-73” for “United States Public Law”; in the first sentence, inserted “any third-party logistics company,” “third-party logistics company or,” and “or private purposes, except that such third-party logistics company shall not use the school buses to provide transportation of passengers for compensation or for residential delivery of products for compensation”; added the third sentence; inserted “third-party logistics company” in the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-183.
When warning lights and identification to be covered.

It shall be unlawful for a school bus licensed in this Commonwealth to be operated on the public highways of this Commonwealth for the purpose of transporting persons or commodities other than school personnel, school children or elderly or mentally or physically handicapped persons unless the lettered identification and school bus traffic warning lights on the front and rear of such bus are covered with some opaque detachable material. This section shall not apply to any such bus when operated by a salesman or demonstrator in connection with a prospective sale or delivery of a bus.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-151.2, 22-280.1; 1973, c. 368; 1975, c. 633; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-184.
School bus emergency drills.

At every public school having public school buses there shall be held, at least once during the first ninety calendar days of each school session and oftener if necessary, a drill in leaving school buses under emergency circumstances.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-280.2; 1964, c. 174; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-185.
Shelters on bus routes.

The governing body of any county, city or town may expend funds for the construction and maintenance at points on school bus routes of such shelters, platforms or other structures as it may deem necessary or convenient for the protection and comfort of children of school age who go to such points to meet school buses.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-282; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-186.
Payments for transportation of pupils.

The regulations of the Board of Education governing state payments for pupil transportation shall provide for payments to school divisions for pupil transportation provided by the school divisions both through systems operated by the school divisions and through contracts with public transportation facilities.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-283.1; 1972, c. 699; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-187.
Exemption from payment of tolls by certain students, etc.

It shall be unlawful to collect any toll for the use of any road, highway, bridge, or ferry in the Commonwealth, except those financed under the Transportation Development and Revenue Bond Act (§

33.2-1700

et seq.) or other act authorizing the construction by the State or a political subdivision thereof of projects financed by the issuance of bonds payable solely from tolls and other revenues of the project, (i) by any student or other person using the road, highway, bridge, or ferry daily for going to or from immediate attendance upon any school, institution of higher education, or other educational institution in the Commonwealth, or classes in water safety training conducted under the auspices of the American Red Cross, or (ii) by the vehicle carrying the student or other person.

Any such student or other person or the parent or guardian of any such student may apply for and receive from the principal of any school, institution of higher education, or other educational institution in the Commonwealth a card certifying that the student or other person uses such road, highway, bridge, or ferry daily for regularly attending such school, institution of higher education, or educational institution or classes at any such school or institution. Such card exhibited to the person in charge of any tollgate on any road, highway, bridge, or ferry in the Commonwealth shall be accepted in lieu of all charges for the passage through such tollgate of any such student, person, or the vehicle carrying him when using the road, highway, bridge, or ferry daily for going to or from immediate attendance at any such school, institution of higher education, or other educational institution or classes at any such school or institution.

Any person using any such card, except for the purpose herein specified, shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-277; 1956, c. 237; 1958, c. 465; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to inapplicability of certain laws to high-occupancy toll lanes, see §

33.2-505

.

Editor’s note.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” and “institution of higher education” for “college” throughout;
inserted “at any such school or institution” at the end of the first and last sentences in the second paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.